it: Design del riflettore: Barndoor; Beauty dish; Rimbalzo; Honeycomb; Softbox; Ombrellini; Altro
da: Refleksdesign: Ladedøre; Skønhedsfad; Bounce; Honeycomb; Softbox; Paraply; Andet
tr: Reflektör tasarımı: Ambar kapıları; Portre çanağı; Sıçrama; Bal peteği; Softbox; Şemsiye; Diğer
sv: Reflektorutförande: Ladugårdsdörrar; Beauty dish; Bounce; Honeycomb; Bouncer; Paraply; Övrigt
zh-CN: 反光罩设计: 挡光板; 雷达罩; 反射; 蜂窝; 柔光箱; 伞; 其他
ru: Конструкция отражателя: Шторки; Портретная тарелка; Отражатель; Соты; Софтбокс; Зонтик; Другой
es: Diseño del reflector: Barndoors; Beauty dish; Reflector; Panal; Softbox; Sombrilla; Otros
pt-PT: Design de refletor: Bandeiras de 4 folhas; Beauty dish; Bounce; Honeycomb; Softbox; Sombrinha; Outro
nb: Reflektordesign: Låvedører; Myklysreflektor; Sprette; Bikake; Softbox; Paraply; Annet
sl-SI: Dizajn reflektorja: Loputa; Lepotni krožnik; Odboj; Satje; Softbox; Dežnik; Drugo
pt-BR: Formato do refletor: Abas dobráveis; Refletor de beleza; Difusor; Favo de mel; Softbox; Guarda-chuva; Outro
zh-TW: 反光裝置設計: 擋光板; 美人諜; 彈跳; 蜂巢; 柔光箱; 傘; 其他
lt-LT: Reflektoriaus dizainas: „Barndoors“ reflektorius; „Beauty Dish“ apvalus šviesos skaidytuvas; Atšvaitas; Korio formos; Šviesadėžė; Skėtis; Kita
en: Reflector design: Barndoors; Beauty dish; Bounce; Honeycomb; Softbox; Umbrella; Other
vi: Thiết kế máy phản xạ: Cửa trượt; Công cụ điều chỉnh ánh sáng Beauty dish; Nảy; Honeycomb; Hộp làm mềm ánh sáng; Ô; Khác
sk-SK: Dizajn reflektora: Posuvné drevené dvere; Reflektor Beauty dish; Reflektor Bounce; Reflektor Honeycomb; Reflektor Softbox; Reflektor Umbrella; Iné
el: Σχέδιο ανακλαστήρα: Barndoors; Beauty dish; Bounce; Honeycomb; Softbox; Με ομπρέλα; Άλλο
ja: 反射板の種類: バーンドア; ビューティーディッシュ; バウンス型; ハニカム; ソフトボックス; 折りたたみ; その他
fr: Conception du réflecteur: Réflecteurs pour flash à volets; Beauty dish; Rebond; Honeycomb; Boîte à lumière; Parapluie; Autre
nl: Reflectorontwerp: Barndoors; Beauty dish; Bounce; Honingraat; Softbox; Paraplu; Andere
fi: Heijastimen muotoilu: Siivet; Heijastinkupu; Heijastua; Hunajakenno; Tasovalo; Sateenvarjo; Muu
th: การออกแบบแผ่นสะท้อนแสง: บาร์นดอร์; จานกระจายแสง; สะท้อน; รังผึ้ง; ซอฟต์บ็อกซ์; ร่ม; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Design reflector: Barndoors; Beauty dish; Bounce; Fagure; Softbox; Umbrelă; Altele
de: Design des Reflektors: Scheunentor-Reflektoren; Beauty Dish; Bounce; Honeycomb; Softbox; Regenschirm; Sonstiges
ko: 반사기 디자인: 반도어; 뷰티 디쉬; 바운스; 벌집; 소프트박스; 우산; 기타
hr-HR: Dizajn reflektora: Barn Doors; Beauty Dish; Odbijanje; Saće; Softbox; Kišobran; Ostalo
pl: Konstrukcja reflektora: Barndoors; Beauty dish; Blenda; Plaster; Softbox; Parasolka; Inne
hu: Fényvisszaverő kialakítása: Pajtaajtók; Beauty Dish; Bounce; Méhsejt alakú; Softbox; Esernyő; Egyéb
bg-BG: Дизайн на отразител: Врати за плевня; Beauty dish; Отразяващ; Пчелна пита; Софтбокс; Чадър; Други
cs: Konstrukce reflektoru: Klapky; Kosmetická miska; Odrazový; Honeycomb; Softbox; Deštníček; Jiné